Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.530

Required notice to prospective borrower about counseling—Form—Contents—Annual disclosure statements—Property appraisals.

(1) A proprietary reverse mortgage loan application may not be taken by a lender unless the loan applicant has received from the lender the following plain language statement in conspicuous bold sixteen-point type or larger, advising the prospective borrower about counseling prior to obtaining the reverse mortgage loan within three business days of receipt of the completed loan application:

"Important notice to reverse mortgage loan applicant

A reverse mortgage is a complex financial transaction that provides a means of using the equity you have built up in your home, or the value of your home, as a way to access home equity.

If you decide to obtain a reverse mortgage loan, you will sign binding legal documents that will have important legal, tax, and financial implications for you and your estate.

It is very important for you to understand the terms of the reverse mortgage and its effect. Before entering into this transaction, you are required by law to consult with an independent loan counselor. A list of approved counselors will be provided to you by the lender or broker. You may also want to discuss your decision with family members or others on whom you rely for financial advice."

(2) As part of the disclosure required under this section, the lender or servicer shall provide an annual, or more frequent, disclosure statement to the borrower, providing details of the loan advances, balance, other terms, and the name and telephone number of the lender's employee or agent who has been specifically designated to respond to inquiries concerning reverse mortgage loans.

(3) In addition to any other loan documentation or disclosure, prior to execution of the loan and at the end of the loan term, the lender may either obtain an independent appraisal of the property value or use the current year's tax assessment valuation of the property. Copies of these appraisals must be timely provided to the borrower within five days of the borrower's written request, provided the borrower has paid for the appraisal.

[ 2009 c 149 s 6.]